Illinois, session 104th, SB3755.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5f as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5f)7    Sec. 5-5f. Elimination and limitations of medical 8assistance services. Notwithstanding any other provision of 9this Code to the contrary, on and after July 1, 2012:10        (a) The following service shall no longer be a covered 11    service available under this Code: group psychotherapy for 12    residents of any facility licensed under the Nursing Home 13    Care Act or the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation 14    Act of 2013. 15        (b) The Department shall place the following 16    limitations on services: (i) the Department shall limit 17    adult eyeglasses to one pair every 2 years; however, the 18    limitation does not apply to an individual who needs 19    different eyeglasses following a surgical procedure such 20    as cataract surgery; (ii) the Department shall set an 21    annual limit of a maximum of 20 visits for each of the 22    following services: adult speech, hearing, and language 23    therapy services, adult occupational therapy services, and   SB3755- 2 -LRB104 20193 KTG 33644 b1    physical therapy services; on or after October 1, 2014, 2    the annual maximum limit of 20 visits shall expire but the 3    Department may require prior approval for all individuals 4    for speech, hearing, and language therapy services, 5    occupational therapy services, and physical therapy 6    services; (iii) the Department shall limit adult podiatry 7    services to individuals with diabetes; on or after October 8    1, 2014, podiatry services shall not be limited to 9    individuals with diabetes; (iv) the Department shall pay 10    for caesarean sections at the normal vaginal delivery rate 11    unless a caesarean section was medically necessary; (v) 12    the Department shall limit adult dental services to 13    emergencies; beginning July 1, 2013, the Department shall 14    ensure that the following conditions are recognized as 15    emergencies: (A) dental services necessary for an 16    individual in order for the individual to be cleared for a 17    medical procedure, such as a transplant; (B) extractions 18    and dentures necessary for a diabetic to receive proper 19    nutrition; (C) extractions and dentures necessary as a 20    result of cancer treatment; and (D) dental services 21    necessary for the health of a pregnant woman prior to 22    delivery of her baby; on or after July 1, 2014, adult 23    dental services shall no longer be limited to emergencies, 24    and dental services necessary for the health of a pregnant 25    woman prior to delivery of her baby shall continue to be 26    covered; and (vi) effective July 1, 2012 through June 30,   SB3755- 3 -LRB104 20193 KTG 33644 b1    2021, the Department shall place limitations and require 2    concurrent review on every inpatient detoxification stay 3    to prevent repeat admissions to any hospital for 4    detoxification within 60 days of a previous inpatient 5    detoxification stay. The Department shall convene a 6    workgroup of hospitals, substance abuse providers, care 7    coordination entities, managed care plans, and other 8    stakeholders to develop recommendations for quality 9    standards, diversion to other settings, and admission 10    criteria for patients who need inpatient detoxification, 11    which shall be published on the Department's website no 12    later than September 1, 2013. 13        (c) The Department shall require prior approval of the 14    following services: wheelchair repairs costing more than 15    $750, coronary artery bypass graft, and bariatric surgery 16    consistent with Medicare standards concerning patient 17    responsibility. Wheelchair repair prior approval requests 18    shall be adjudicated within one business day of receipt of 19    complete supporting documentation. Providers may not break 20    wheelchair repairs into separate claims for purposes of 21    staying under the $750 threshold for requiring prior 22    approval. The wholesale price of manual and power 23    wheelchairs, durable medical equipment and supplies, and 24    complex rehabilitation technology products and services 25    shall be defined as actual acquisition cost including all 26    discounts.   SB3755- 4 -LRB104 20193 KTG 33644 b1        (d) (Blank). The Department shall establish benchmarks 2    for hospitals to measure and align payments to reduce 3    potentially preventable hospital readmissions, inpatient 4    complications, and unnecessary emergency room visits. In 5    doing so, the Department shall consider items, including, 6    but not limited to, historic and current acuity of care 7    and historic and current trends in readmission. The 8    Department shall publish provider-specific historical 9    readmission data and anticipated potentially preventable 10    targets 60 days prior to the start of the program. In the 11    instance of readmissions, the Department shall adopt 12    policies and rates of reimbursement for services and other 13    payments provided under this Code to ensure that, by June 14    30, 2013, expenditures to hospitals are reduced by, at a 15    minimum, $40,000,000. 16        (e) The Department shall establish utilization 17    controls for the hospice program such that it shall not 18    pay for other care services when an individual is in 19    hospice. 20        (f) For home health services, the Department shall 21    require Medicare certification of providers participating 22    in the program and implement the Medicare face-to-face 23    encounter rule. The Department shall require providers to 24    implement auditable electronic service verification based 25    on global positioning systems or other cost-effective 26    technology.   SB3755- 5 -LRB104 20193 KTG 33644 b1        (g) For the Home Services Program operated by the 2    Department of Human Services and the Community Care 3    Program operated by the Department on Aging, the 4    Department of Human Services, in cooperation with the 5    Department on Aging, shall implement an electronic service 6    verification based on global positioning systems or other 7    cost-effective technology. 8        (h) Effective with inpatient hospital admissions on or 9    after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce the 10    payment for a claim that indicates the occurrence of a 11    provider-preventable condition during the admission as 12    specified by the Department in rules. The Department shall 13    not pay for services related to an other 14    provider-preventable condition.15        As used in this subsection (h):16        "Provider-preventable condition" means a health care 17    acquired condition as defined under the federal Medicaid 18    regulation found at 42 CFR 447.26 or an other 19    provider-preventable condition.20        "Other provider-preventable condition" means a wrong 21    surgical or other invasive procedure performed on a 22    patient, a surgical or other invasive procedure performed 23    on the wrong body part, or a surgical procedure or other 24    invasive procedure performed on the wrong patient. 25        (i) The Department shall implement cost savings 26    initiatives for advanced imaging services, cardiac imaging   SB3755- 6 -LRB104 20193 KTG 33644 b1    services, pain management services, and back surgery. Such 2    initiatives shall be designed to achieve annual costs 3    savings. 4        (j) The Department shall ensure that beneficiaries 5    with a diagnosis of epilepsy or seizure disorder in 6    Department records will not require prior approval for 7    anticonvulsants. 8(Source: P.A. 101-209, eff. 8-5-19; 102-43, Article 5, Section 95-5, eff. 7-6-21; 102-43, Article 30, Section 30-5, eff. 107-6-21; 102-43, Article 80, Section 80-5, eff. 7-6-21; 11102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)